Hawaii statutes.
[PART VII.]
AUTOMATED VICTIM INFORMATION AND

NOTIFICATION
SYSTEM

[§353-131] Definitions. For
purposes of this part:

"Offender" means a person in the
custody of the department of public safety or the Hawaii paroling authority but
does not include juveniles under the jurisdiction of the family court.

"System" means the statewide
automated victim information and notification system.

"Victim" means a person against whom
a crime has been committed by the offender and includes, in homicide cases,
surviving immediate family members. [L 2012, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next